Louisiana, session 2026, HB1185.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part V-B of Subchapter B of Chapter 5-D of Title 40 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 40:1190.1 through 1190.5, is hereby enacted
to read as follows:
PART V-B. PRESERVATION ACT FOR OTHER RURAL HOSPITALS
§1190.1. Short title
This Part may be cited as the "Preservation Act For Other Rural Hospitals".
§1190.2. Legislative findings; purpose
The legislature finds that:
(1) Small rural hospitals provide most of the healthcare services required by
a substantial number of low-income rural residents living in the state and therefore
constitute an invaluable part of the healthcare delivery system of the state.
(2) Residents living in rural areas of the state, which consist of sixty-four
percent of the state's parishes, are in poorer health than residents living in the urban
areas of the state and lack adequate public transportation.
Page 1 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2602 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1185
(3) Other small rural hospitals are in poor financial condition as a result of
payment reductions in the Medicare and Medicaid programs and as a result of the
advent and penetration of managed care in the state.
(4) Other rural hospitals have a difficult time attracting physicians to practice
in their service areas, thereby resulting in a continued shortage of primary health care
in the state's rural areas.
(5) Reductions in the Medicare and Medicaid programs, changes in
healthcare reimbursement methodologies, and the spread of managed care could
cause the closure of many of the state's other rural hospitals, thereby jeopardizing the
very existence of a vital link in the healthcare delivery systems for residents residing
in rural areas of the state.
(6) Other rural hospitals often constitute the largest single employer of
residents in areas served by them and thus constitute a vital component of many rural
parish economies.
(7) The enactment of the Rural Hospital Preservation Act has preserved
Louisiana's rural hospitals, a key component of the state's healthcare safety net which
is essential to ensuring access to health care for Louisiana's rural residents, and other
rural hospitals require the same efforts to survive.
(8) The Preservation Act for Other Rural Hospitals requires the Louisiana
Department of Health to maximize Medicaid reimbursement to other rural hospitals
comparable to rural hospitals.
(9) Congress has established a federal cap on each state's allotment of
Medicaid disproportionate share reimbursement and Louisiana's disproportionate
share expenditures have reached the federal cap.
(10) It is in the state's interest to reduce unreimbursed costs at other rural
hospitals by increasing Medicaid reimbursement for inpatient and outpatient services
at other rural hospitals, including costs associated with services provided at rural
health clinics that are licensed as part of other rural hospitals.
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2602 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1185
(11) Increasing inpatient and outpatient reimbursement under Medicaid at
other rural hospitals will increase the disproportionate share hospital funding
available to the state for non-rural, hospital-related disproportionate share hospital
payments, thereby permitting the state to meet additional hospital-related
uncompensated care needs.
§1190.3. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the meaning ascribed in this
Section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Health or its successor
in the role of designated state agency under Title XIX of the Social Security Act or
any successor Act including but not limited to block grants or other funding for
medical care of the poor.
(2) "Emergency medical condition" means acute symptoms of sufficient
severity such that the absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be
expected to result in any one or more of the following:
(a) Placing the health of the individual in serious jeopardy, including the
health of the unborn child in the case of a pregnant woman.
(b) Serious impairment to any bodily function.
(c) Serious dysfunction of any bodily part.
(3) "Healthcare provider" means a person, corporation, facility, or institution
licensed by the state to provide health care or professional services as a physician,
nurse, or allied health professional.
(4) "Other rural hospital" means a hospital licensed by the department which
has no more than sixty hospital beds, excluding distinct part psychiatric unit beds,
distinct part rehabilitation unit beds, and nursery bassinets, as of October 1, 2024,
and meets all of the following criteria:
(a) Is not located within one of Louisiana's metropolitan statistical areas as
delineated in Office of Management and Budget Bulletin No. 23-01.
(b) Has an operational emergency room.
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2602 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1185
(c) Is located in a municipality with a population of less than twenty-three
thousand as measured by the latest federal decennial census.
(d) Is not a rural hospital as defined in R.S. 40:1189.3, a long-term care
hospital, a rehabilitation hospital, or a free-standing psychiatric hospital.
(5) "Prospective rate approximating cost" means the median cost of an other
rural hospital providing inpatient acute or inpatient psychiatric services plus ten
percent, which cost has been inflated by the Medicare market basket inflation factor
to the midpoint of the state's fiscal year in which services may be furnished. The
median cost and rates shall be re-based by the department at least every other year
using the most current other rural hospital cost reports on file with the department.
(6) "Reasonable cost" means the cost of hospital outpatient services,
including without limitation provider-based rural health clinics, utilizing Medicare
cost reimbursement principles applicable to the respective other rural hospital,
including hospital-based rural health clinics licensed at hospital departments. In the
event a more limited definition of reasonable cost is required to obtain federal
approval for the related state plan amendment for those other rural hospitals that are
reimbursed under Medicare's Prospective Payment System, hereinafter referred to
in this Part as "PPS", the department shall utilize the most liberal definition of
"reasonable cost" for such rural PPS hospitals that is acceptable to the United States
Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services, hereinafter referred to in this Part as "CMS".
(7) "Rural hospital" means a hospital defined in R.S. 40:1189.3.
(8) "State plan for medical assistance" means the plan promulgated by the
department in accordance with its role as designated state agency under Title XIX
of the Social Security Act, or its successor plan, including but not limited to any plan
adopted pursuant to any federal law creating block grants or other funding for
medical care of the poor.
§1190.4. Medical assistance programs; other rural hospital reimbursement
A. The department shall adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act that provide the following:
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2602 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1185
(1) Allow an other rural hospital to certify, as a contributing public agency,
public funds as representing expenditures eligible for federal financial participation
in the Medicaid program to the extent authorized by federal law. The expenditure of
such funds shall be in accordance with rules promulgated by the department.
(2)(a) Maximize funding for services rendered by other rural hospitals to the
extent allowed by federal law, comparable to funding for services rendered by rural
hospitals, and in amounts that may be appropriated by the legislature relative to the
use of Medicaid reimbursement. To the extent that intergovernmental transfers and
the certification of eligible expenditures are available for recognition of state match
for such Medicaid reimbursement, the department shall maximize the use of such
amounts for the benefit of other rural hospitals to increase access to health care for
Medicaid and LaCHIP beneficiaries as well as indigent individuals.
(b) Subject to the limitations provided for in R.S. 40:1190.5, by September
1, 2026, the department shall file a state plan amendment with CMS amending the
Medicaid state plan provisions governing Medicaid hospital reimbursement to
provide that an other rural hospital, as defined in R.S. 40:1190.3, shall be reimbursed
at a rate, comparable to rural hospitals, which equals or approximates one hundred
ten percent, or, if a reduction is required by CMS, the maximum amount acceptable
to CMS, but in no event less than one hundred percent of the appropriate reasonable
cost of providing hospital inpatient and outpatient services, including but not limited
to services provided in rural health clinics licensed as part of an other rural hospital.
The new payment methodology for other rural hospitals shall utilize prospective
rates approximating costs at the time of service for inpatient acute and psychiatric
services. To ensure that outpatient services at other rural hospitals are reimbursed
in the aggregate at one hundred ten percent of the reasonable costs or such lesser
amounts as approved by CMS, but in no event less than one hundred percent of their
reasonable costs, the department shall pay an interim rate for cost-based outpatient
services at one hundred ten percent of reasonable cost during the year and for fee-
based services paid on a claim-by-claim basis, and the department shall make
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2602 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1185
quarterly estimates of a supplemental payment required to bring the hospital's
reimbursement for such services up to one hundred percent of reasonable costs and
immediately remit such payments to the hospital and at final settlement pay such
amounts as necessary to ensure that all outpatient services in the aggregate, cost
based and fee schedule, are paid at one hundred ten percent of reasonable costs.
(c) On an expedited basis, the department shall take all steps necessary and
available to obtain CMS approval for the state plan amendment and shall,
immediately upon notification of such approval, promulgate an emergency rule to
implement the state plan amendment that complies with the limitations provided for
in R.S. 40:1190.5.
(d) Once the outpatient cost-based reimbursement payment methodology is
implemented, the department shall set and monitor interim payment rates to
minimize the amount of annual cost settlements.
(e) For cost reporting periods ending after July 1, 2026, the department shall
pay, at least comparable to such payment to rural hospitals, seventy-five percent of
interim other rural hospital outpatient cost report settlement amounts due and one
hundred percent of final other rural hospital outpatient cost report settlement
amounts due within fourteen days of receipt by the department of such reports from
the Medicaid audit contractor.
(f) The new payment methodology for other rural hospitals shall be effective
for services provided on or after July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as may be
permitted by federal law.
(3)(a) Effective for services provided on or after July 1, 2026, or as soon
thereafter as may be permitted by federal law, the department shall develop and
implement, by emergency rule, a payment methodology comparable to the payment
methodology for other rural hospitals, including but not limited to directed payments,
which optimizes Medicaid inpatient and outpatient payments to other rural hospitals.
Payments shall be developed utilizing available Medicare upper payment limits,
average commercial rates, or other standard for inpatient and outpatient services in
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2602 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1185
accordance with state and federal law. Calculated payments shall be distributed to
qualifying other rural hospitals no less than quarterly, or as authorized by federal
law.
(b) After federal funds are optimized, the remaining appropriated funds for
other rural hospitals may be utilized to develop a state-only funded program to
provide direct funds to qualifying other rural hospitals to support access to services
that would not be available otherwise. In the event the amount appropriated for such
state-only funded program is insufficient in any state fiscal year to meet the total
payments required by all other rural hospitals to recover payment reductions, the
payments to qualifying other rural hospitals pursuant to this state-only funded
program may be reduced proportionately.
(c) The department shall review Medicaid and uninsured cost information,
payment information, patient charges, and hospital financial statements to the extent
required by state or federal law to determine the optimal combination of payments.
(d) Other rural hospitals that do not provide the minimum set of
documentation required in Subparagraph (3)(c) of this Paragraph to determine the
optimal combination of payments shall not be eligible for additional payments.
(e) The department is hereby authorized to publish and promulgate rules in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of
this Paragraph, subject to the limitations provided for in R.S. 40:1190.5.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this Part to the contrary, other rural
hospitals shall not be eligible to receive any reimbursement increase, supplemental
payment, directed payment, or any other payment authorized in accordance with this
Part, unless such hospital is current on all assessment payments and is not delinquent
or in arrears as determined by the department.
(b) The department shall withhold, offset, or recoup any payments
authorized in accordance with this Part for any hospital that is not compliance with
assessment obligations until such obligations are satisfied.
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2602 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1185
B. The rules promulgated pursuant to Subsection A of this Section shall be
promulgated no later than one hundred twenty days after August 15, 2026. No later
than one hundred twenty days after August 15, 2026, the department shall also
submit to the secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services those amendments to the state plan for medical assistance necessary to
conform the state plan for medical assistance with the provisions of Subsection A of
this Section subject to the limitations provided for in R.S. 40:1190.5.
§1190.5. Separate funding
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, annual funding for
other rural hospitals shall be subject to a separate annual appropriation by the
legislature and shall be a sufficient amount so as to protect and hold rural hospitals
harmless from any direct or indirect negative financial effects from the
implementation of this Part. The provisions of the Part or the implementation of this
Part shall not directly or indirectly reduce, replace, negatively affect, supplant, or
otherwise adversely affect current reimbursement or payment methodology utilized
on or reimbursement paid to rural hospitals, including but not limited to prospective
inpatient or outpatient rates as provided for in R.S. 40:1189.4. Rural hospital
Medicaid supplemental payments of any type, including without limitation directed
payments and related reconciliation adjustments, full Medicaid pricing payments, or
upper payment limit payments shall not be directly or indirectly negatively affected
by the provisions of this Part.
B. The department shall ensure funding provided in accordance with this
Part to other rural hospitals shall be supplemental to and shall not be used to offset,
subset, offset, substitute for, or reduce any existing or future federal, state, or local
funding streams available to rural hospitals.
C. The department shall ensure that implementation of this Part does not
result in any reduction in Medicaid reimbursement received by small rural hospitals,
either individually or in the aggregate.
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2602 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1185
Section 2. This Act applies to Other Rural Hospitals as defined in state plan
amendment TN 24-0022, which became effective September 17, 2024. With respect to
reconciliation of managed care of state directed payments made to these hospitals under the
preprint approved by CMS on November 7, 2024, applicable to state fiscal year July 1, 2024
through June 30, 2025, the department shall ensure that these hospitals realize the net
economic benefit they would have received had state plan amendment TN 24-0022 been
effective July 1, 2024.
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to re-
designate Part V of Subchapter B of Chapter 5-D of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 40:1189.1 through 1189.7, as Part V-A of Subchapter
B of Chapter 5-D of Title 40.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.